Educational Service Delivery Summary ______________________________________________________ The Duval County School District is using all of the educational service delivery best practices.
The district has strong instructional programs, and uses academic and other data to guide decision making.
The district also efficiently and effectively meets the needs of students with disabilities, gifted students, and at risk students.
The district makes textbooks and other instructional materials available in core subjects to meet the needs of teachers and students.
In addition, the district has sufficient school libraries and media centers, uses instructional technology to enhance curriculum, and provides necessary support services to ensure that students are able to learn.
Background
__________________________________________________
The Duval County School District served 126,919 students during the 2001-02 school year, with an ethnic breakdown of 48% white, non-Hispanic; 43% black, non-Hispanic; 4% Hispanic; 3% Asian/Pacific Islander; and 2% other.
For Fiscal Year 2001-02, the operating costs in the district were $5,554 per pupil, less than all its comparison peer districts with the exception of Orange County School District, which spent $5,528 per pupil and less than the state average of $5,820.
Students from stable home situations, in which learning is valued and efforts for the child's progress are jointly supported by both the home and the school, have a much better chance of success in learning the material that enables them to score well on all types of exams.
By contrast, students who are moved frequently, come from broken families, or who have not had the opportunity to be exposed to educational vocabularies used by parents with high levels of education have a greater learning challenge.
These challenges can be overcome with the availability of proper resources at the schools and with adequate time in an educational system designed for their success.
Duval County School District serves a challenging student population whose adult population has a 46% functional illiteracy rate.
Additionally, the population has a divorce rate of 73%, a poverty rate of 17%, and a mobility rate of almost 40%, which is approximately 7% higher than the state's mobility rate.
As Exhibit 4-1 shows, the Duval County School District has a higher dropout rate than any of its peers.
The district has a very low percentage of students served in the English for Speakers of Other Languages (ESOL) program.
The percentage of students who are eligible for free or reduced-priced lunch is one of the highest among its peer districts and just slightly lower than the state.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-1
Educational Service Delivery Exhibit 4-1 Duval County School District Student Demographics District Broward Hillsborough Orange Palm Beach Pinellas Duval State 1
2000-01 Graduation Total Students Rate 262,0 169,9 157,4 160,1 114,6 127,4 2,499,7 28 48 98 45 01 17 81 65.2% 77.5% 68.3% 66.6% 66.4% 61.0% 67.9%
Dropout Rate 1.3% 2.2% 2.8% 2.6% 5.2% 5.7% 3.2%
English for Speakers of Other Languages (ESOL)1 11.6% 10.7% 11.6% 11.5% 2.5% 1.9% 8.2%
Percentage Eligible for Free or Reduce Price Lunch 37.5% 47.0% 43.6% 40.2% 34.5% 41.6% 43.7%
The percentages listed for ESOL students in each of the peer districts reflects end of the 2001-02 school year statistics.
Source: Department of Education (DOE) Profiles of Florida School Districts 2000-01.
The Duval County School District's instructional program is led by the superintendent with the assistance of an associate superintendent for curriculum and five regional superintendents.
As shown in Exhibit 4-2, this team is also assisted by the directors in the respective areas.
The research, assessment and evaluation department supplies a multitude of data to assist this team in managing and leading the instructional program.
Exhibit 4-2 District-level Educational Service Delivery Functions
Superintendent
Research, Assessment, Evaluation
Associate Superintendent Curriculum and Instructional Services Special Program Directors
Regional Superintendents
Regional Directors
Source: Duval County School District.
The Duval County School District serves students through several types of programs, including the K-12 basic education program, the Exceptional Student Education program, at-risk programs, accelerated programs, and vocational and adult education programs.
K-12 Basic Education.
Basic education refers to a wide array of curriculum and instruction offered to students in pre-kindergarten through twelfth grade.
In 1996, the State Board of Education approved the Sunshine State Standards for student achievement in basic education.
These standards apply to seven subject areas and are divided among four separate grade clusters (PreK-2, 3-5, 6-8, and 9-12).
The grade division provides flexibility to school districts in designing curricula that are based on local needs.
In language arts, mathematics, science, and social studies, the Sunshine State Standards are further defined
4-2
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery to include grade-level expectations that are the basis for the Florida Comprehensive Assessment Test (FCAT).
The purpose of the FCAT is to assess achievement of the Sunshine State Standards in reading, mathematics, and writing.
The FCAT also includes a norm-referenced test, which reports the performance of Florida students compared to students nationwide.
Currently, students in grades 3 to 10 take both forms of the FCAT reading and mathematics tests.
Students in grades 4, 8, and 10 take the FCAT writing test.
Exceptional Student Education (ESE).
ESE is designed for students who meet specific federal and state criteria.
In Florida, an "exceptional student" is a student with disabilities or a student who is gifted and is enrolled in (or eligible for enrollment in) a district public school.
School districts must provide students with disabilities and students who are gifted the opportunity to receive a free appropriate public education that will maximize their learning.
Schools use a variety of strategies, such as modifying schedules, changing teachers, or varying instructional techniques to help ESE students meet their potential and succeed in the classroom.
Districts identify students who are eligible for ESE programs and provide special education programs and related services to meet the individual needs of those students.
The percentage of Duval County School District students identified and served in the district's ESE program (19%) is lower than most of its peers.
Approximately 16% of the district's students have disabilities, while 3% are gifted.
Teachers, parents, or guidance counselors begin the ESE process by referring students for assessment.
Child study teams (comprising of at a minimum, principal/designee, student services representative, and ESE director/designee) address written requests for formal evaluations of students who are suspected of needing special education according to the process outlined in the Special Programs and Procedures for Exceptional Students.
The child study team initially screens students at the school level by reviewing the case, assessing the student, and determining whether appropriate interventions implemented to assist the student have been successful.
If the child study team finds that these attempts prove unsuccessful, the team refers the student for further evaluation as appropriate.
The results of this evaluation determine the student's ESE status.
If the student requires ESE services, the child study team meets to decide the most appropriate placement for the student.
Exhibit 4-3 illustrates this process.
Exhibit 4-3 The Child Study Team Referral Process Pre-referral Activities Child Study Team Pre-referral Activities Reviewed Referral for Evaluation Evaluation Placement
Source: Developed by OPPAGA.
At-Risk Programs.
The Duval County School District provides several programs for students who need academic or social skills interventions to assist them to be successful, including Title I, ESOL, and alternative education programs.
Title I is funded by both federal and state sources and provides services to schools with high concentrations of poverty as determined by the number of students who receive free or reduced lunch.
For a school to qualify for school wide Title I services, at least 50% or more of its students must meet the criteria for free or reduced lunch.
As noted earlier, the percentage of students in the district's ESOL program is very low.
The district uses the inclusion approach to educate ESOL students, placing students in the regular classroom.
School administrators identify ESOL students based on the results of the home language survey administered through the ESOL district office.
Guidance counselors are responsible for ensuring that students progress and that their needs are met.
To exit the program, students must achieve certain reading and writing criteria.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-3
Educational Service Delivery The district also offers several alternative education programs for economically disadvantaged students and for students who are at risk of failing to meet the district's standards by providing academic assistance and recreational/enrichment opportunities.
Developed in partnership with the Jacksonville Children's Commission and community-based agencies to provide academic assistance and recreational/enrichment opportunities for students in grades K-12, these safety net programs include: Extended Day Enrichment Program, TEAM UP, Accelerated Learning Centers, and Graduation Initiatives.
Accelerated Programs.
The Duval County School District provides students several accelerated opportunities, including advanced placement, dual enrollment, early admission to postsecondary education, and access to the Florida Virtual School.
The district also has two campuses offering the International Baccalaureate program, a course of study that provides an advanced level of high school coursework based on a specific curriculum designed to allow students to meet various international university entrance standards.
Dual enrollment programs allow high school students to enroll in courses for which they can receive both high school and college credit.
These courses can be academic courses that count toward an associate or baccalaureate degree or vocational courses that count toward meeting vocational certificate requirements.
Florida Community College at Jacksonville instructors teach dual enrollment classes at some high schools.
The advance placement program allows high-achieving and self-motivated high school students to enroll in advanced courses of study and earn college credit or advanced placement credit while still enrolled in high school.
Core advanced placement courses are offered at each high school and select advanced placement courses are offered at each high school depending upon the interest of the students at that high school.
The district's students may also take courses through the Florida Virtual School.
Students who enroll in this online school take classes for graduation credit over the Internet, allowing them to learn at their own pace.
Students do not physically meet as a group but access coursework over the Internet, using email, fax machines, and telephones to communicate with teachers and other students.
Certificated personnel proctor required exams.
Vocational and Adult Education.
Unlike its peers, Duval County School District does not provide vocational and technical education for postsecondary students.
This function is assumed by the Florida Community College of Jacksonville.
The district does provide applied technology and career development programs for secondary students.
These programs reflect community needs by obtaining input from the Jacksonville Chamber of Commerce, local labor union involvement in pre-apprenticeship programs, local community college involvement with technical preparation articulation and dual enrollment agreements, and feedback from local business and industry partners and advisory committee members.
Student Support Services.
In the Duval County School District, the Student Services Department provides psychological services, social work services and guidance services.
The district partners with the Duval County Department of Health to provide students with school health services.
The objective of these student support services is to provide support outside of the classroom, which helps students to overcome problems that could interfere with their academic success and to broaden their education experience.
Further description of student support services appears later in this chapter.
4-4
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery
Activities of particular interest Some school districts have developed programs that are especially noteworthy and can serve as a model for other school districts to follow.
In the Duval County School District, these programs include the Safety Net Programs, the Standards Based Initiative, School Profile, and the War Room.
Safety Net Programs Replace Traditional Summer School.
The district ended traditional summer school in favor of more educationally sound practices.
These practices, known as year-round safety nets and grade recovery efforts, assist students in their subject areas all year long as opposed to making up course work for a few short weeks during the summer.
Schools are assuming responsibility for those students who are being challenged in their academics at an earlier stage, and teachers are providing additional guidance and instruction to students before they get too far behind in their studies.
Standards Based Initiative.
The standards based training initiative was designed to build capacity to sustain elements of the America's Choice design.
The America's Choice design, funded by Duval County School District, was implemented in 62 schools.
The staff for the standards based programs has experience with best practices, as well as knowledge in effective coaching techniques.
School Profile.
The School Profile report encourages educators to examine issues by looking at a variety of data elements that address performance of grade and race specific groups of students in their school as well as the school's relative standing within the entire district.
The report provides disaggregated data that include FCAT, SAT9, and Lexile scores; student grades; promotion; attendance; socioeconomic status; mobility; conduct; and school climate survey responses from parents, staff, and students.
The report offers those disaggregated data elements for each school in comparison to the following: performance of all students in the school, range of performance (ranked from low to high) of all schools in the district, and mean performance of all students in the district.
The School Profile report is a graphic representation of a school's overall profile at both the micro and the macro levels.
Its broad range of data elements provides educational problem solvers with an avenue for exploring a school's level of performance within its own subgroups and within the district as a whole.
The report's wide range of data elements encourages educators to look at the whole school picture and to examine causal factors in the identification of problems and solutions.
War Room.
The War Room demonstrates the power of data to transform school system performance.
Duval County School District examines many performance indicators not directly related to assessments in an effort to improve the overall K-12 basic education plan.
The superintendent has instituted a mission control room, the War Room, built around five goals known to district personnel as Superintendent Fryer's "High Five."
They are (1) Academic Performance: All students are held to the same high standards and are provided with the opportunities to reach their full potential; (2) Safe Schools: All students and teachers learn and teach in an orderly, secure, and disciplined environment; (3) Accountability: Efforts bring desired results, and people know it; (4) Learning Communities: Everyone in the school system is a learner and a teacher; and (5) High Performance Management Teams: People focus on the mission and work together to achieve the greatest possible results.
The Superintendent established a mission control room to examine data that will lead to the accomplishment of his five goals.
The War Room has 27 indicators depicted with data charts on the wall to guide the data decisions for the district.
Exhibit 4-4 shows each goal with the accompanying indicator that measures the goal.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-5
Educational Service Delivery Exhibit 4-4 The Superintendent's Mission Control Room Goals and Indicators of Success Exemplify Data-Driven Improvement Decision Processes Goal 1: Academic Performance FCAT Performance by Program FCAT Results by Subtest/Content Academic/Special Programs Applied Technology and Career Development Community Education Exceptional Student Education (ESE) Title I Results Magnet Programs/School Choice
Goal 2: Safe Schools Student Services
Goal 3: High Performance Management Teams General Services/Safety General Services/Purchasing Instructional Materials/Media Services Division of Technology
Goal 4: Learning Communities Jacksonville Urban Systemic Initiative (JUSI) Professional Development
Goal 5: Accountability Research/Evaluation
Facilities Division-- Construction Facilities Division-- Maintenance Facilities Division-- Custodial Services
FCAT--Four Years FCAT Performance vs. Satisfactory Grades School Profiles
Readiness for College Learner Profiles Department Profiles JUSI Program Data
RESearch Data Affects Change (RESDAC) Source: McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-6
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery
Conclusion and Recommendations Practice Area Effective and Efficient Instructional Programs Best Practice 1.
__________________
Summary of Conclusions for Educational Service Delivery Best Practices Using the Best Practice? Page No.
District administrators use both academic and nonacademic data to guide them in their decision making about improving K-12 education programs.
The district provides effective and efficient Exceptional Student Education (ESE) programs for students with disabilities and students who are gifted.
The district provides effective and efficient programs to meet the needs of at-risk students (including English for Speakers of Other Languages [ESOL], Title I, and alternative education).
The district provides an appropriate range of accelerated programs (such as Advanced Placement, International Baccalaureate, and Dual Enrollment).
The district provides effective and efficient workforce development programs (such as vocational-technical, adult basic education, and adult high school programs).
The district ensures that schools use effective planning and evaluation processes to improve student outcomes, including school improvement plans and other data-driven processes such as the Sterling process.
The district ensures effective progression of students from kindergarten through grade 12 that maximizes student mastery of the Sunshine State Standards and prepares students for work and continued education.
The district's organizational structure and staffing of educational programs minimizes administrative layers and processes.
The district ensures that students and teachers have sufficient current textbooks and other instructional materials available to support instruction in core subjects and to meet the needs of teachers and students.
Yes
4-8
2.
Yes
4-11
3.
Yes
4-15
4.
Yes
4-16
5.
Yes
4-18
6.
Yes
4-22
7.
Yes Yes
4-23 4-24
8.
Effective and Efficient Instructional Support
9.
Yes Yes Yes
4-26 4-27 4-28
10.
The district has sufficient school library or media centers to support instruction.
11.
The district utilizes instructional technology in the classroom to enhance curriculum and improve student achievement.
12.
The district provides necessary support services (guidance counseling, psychological, social work, and health) to meet student needs and to ensure students are able to learn.
Yes
4-30
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-7
Educational Service Delivery
EFFECTIVE PROGRAMS
AND
E
FFICIENT INSTRUCTIONAL
Best Practice 1: Using District administrators use both academic and nonacademic data to guide them in their decision making about improving K-12 education programs.
Effective school districts use academic and nonacademic data to drive decisions related to their instructional programs and to improve the performance of all students.
To meet this best practice, districts should collect, analyze, and use data regularly to monitor the performance of schools and subgroups of students, identify areas requiring intervention strategies, and evaluate the effectiveness of intervention strategies.
In addition to performing well or showing steady improvement, an effective district uses academic and nonacademic data to establish district goals and priorities, target interventions, and allocate resources.
The Duval County School District, under the leadership of the superintendent, focuses on using academic and nonacademic data to improve the learning of the students in the district.
The superintendent has five results-oriented goals for the district.
These "High Five" are (1) Academic Performance: All students are held to the same high standards and are provided with the opportunities to reach their full potential; (2) Safe Schools: All students and teachers learn and teach in an orderly, secure, and disciplined environment; (3) Accountability: Efforts bring desired results, and people know it; (4) Learning Communities: Everyone in the school system is a learner and a teacher; and (5) High Performance Management Teams: People focus on the mission and work together to achieve the greatest possible results.
The superintendent has established a mission control room, the War Room to examine data related to his five goals.
The War Room has charts on the wall used to guide administrators' decisions and follow progress meeting goals.
The superintendent follows 27 indicators, some of which are the most recent FCAT scores, FCAT scores over four years, school grades, FCAT performance for Title I schools, and drop-out/retention rates.
Of particular note is the district's ability through its Research, Assessment, and Evaluation Department to gather, analyze, and provide evaluative information to district and school administrators.
The Research, Assessment, and Evaluation Department is the statistical hub of Duval County School District.
Its main responsibility is to monitor the progress of students and schools and to help the classroom teacher focus on areas where students are in greatest need of assistance.
The department is responsible for providing data to school-based and district personnel; parent, business, and community organizations; and other educational agencies.
The 4-7 five The district's efforts at improving instruction through the use of data are evident.
Exhibits 4-5, 4-6, and show the progress the district has made in student performance in FCAT reading scores over the last years.
Except for 2002 scores for high school students, the charts indicate continued improvement.
district has made similar progress with student performance on FCAT math assessments.
4-8
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery Exhibit 4-5 Duval County School District Student Performance in Reading Has Improved Over the Past Four Years
FCAT Performance Duval Elementary Schools Percentage of Students Passing Level 3 or Higher 100 80 60 40 20 0 1998 1999 2000 2001 2002
All
Non-Black
Black
Year Source: Duval County School District Research Department.
Exhibit 4-6 Duval County School District Student Performance in Reading Has Improved Over the Past Four Years
FCAT Performance Duval Middle Schools Percentage of Students Passing Level 3 or Higher 80 60 40 20 0 1998 1999 2000 2001 2002
All
Non-Black
Black
Year Source: Duval County School District Research Department.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-9
Educational Service Delivery Exhibit 4-7 Duval County School District Student Performance in Reading Has Improved Over the Past Four Years
FCAT Performance Duval High Schools Percentage of Students Passing Level 3 or Higher 60 50 40 30 20 10 0 1998 1999 2000 2001 2002
All
Non-Black
Black
Year Source: Duval County School District Research Department.
We commend the district for its record of improving student performance.
However, Exhibits 4-5, 4-6, and 4-7 indicate that a large percentage of students, especially high school students (approximately 70%), did not meet Sunshine State Standards as measured by the FCAT Reading assessment.
When compared to peer districts, Duval County School District is at the bottom on the percentage of schools receiving an "A" or "B" grade from the state (see Exhibit 4-8).
School grades are based primarily on FCAT reading, math, and writing scores.
Exhibit 4-8 Duval County School District Has a Lower Percentage of "A" and "B" Schools than Its Peer Districts Percentage Grade A Broward Pinellas Hillsborough Palm Beach Orange Duval State 36.8% 41.9% 37.6% 37.1% 27.5% 28.2% 34.2%
Percentage Grade B 24.o% 19.7% 27.2% 14.7% 20.1% 14.1% 22.3%
Percentage Grade C 26.0% 32.5% 20.2% 25.2% 35.6% 30.9% 28.1%
Percentage Grade D 7.8% 4.3% 4.6% 11.2% 4.7% 14.8% 6.9%
Percentage Grade F 0.5% 0.9% 2.3% 4.9% 7.4% 8.1% 2.7%
Source: Duval County School District Research Department.
While the district is at the bottom of this comparison with its peers, it is currently on the right track using data to correct many of the concerns regarding poor-performing schools.
Interviews with principals and teachers make it apparent that a concerted effort is in place to improve the overall rating of the district.
They supported their beliefs by showing the in-depth in-service training of their teachers, the detailed campus school improvement plans, the detailed academic improvement plans on their lower quartile of students, and the many tutoring and extra help programs that they have initiated.
The district has focused its efforts on those campuses receiving a grade of "F."
They refer to these schools as challenge schools.
For three years, the district has provided structured support to the elementary schools that received a state grade of "F" in 1998-99.
Assistance meetings were conducted
4-10
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery each month and a schedule of ongoing monitoring was implemented.
At the end of the three-year period, four schools achieved satisfactory academic status.
The fifth school has one more year to document satisfactory status.
That school received a grade of "C" for the 2001-02 school year.
The district is providing similar assistance to the schools that most recently received an "F."
In addition to academic assessments, the district evaluates nonacademic data such as graduation and dropout rates and discipline reports.
For example, in response to low graduation and retention rates, the district created Accelerated Learning Centers and the Graduation Initiative Programs for students at high risk of leaving school.
Accelerated Learning Centers provide older students who have fallen behind with the opportunity to complete a standard diploma through flexible teaching methods that combine textbook, Internet, computer, and school-to-work assignments.
Students entering the Graduation Initiative Program working part time are supported academically through traditional and computer-assisted instruction as they complete a GED.
Last year, 63% of these students passed the FCAT and GED and were allowed to graduate with their classmates.
The district credits these programs with improving graduation rates and lowering dropout rates (see Exhibit 4-9).
Exhibit 4-9 Duval County School District Has Reduced Its Dropout Rate 2000-01 District Graduation Rate District Dropout Rate 55.9% 8.3%
2001-02 61.0% 5.7%
Source: Duval County Research Department.
Best Practice 2: Using The district provides effective Exceptional Student Education (ESE) programs for students with disabilities and students who are gifted.
However, the district needs to pursue fee-forservice Medicaid reimbursement for direct services.
Under federal and state law, school districts must provide appropriate services designed to meet the learning needs of students with disabilities and students who are gifted.
To meet this best practice, school districts should identify and place students who require Exceptional Student Education (ESE) services in a timely manner and ensure access of minority students to the gifted program.
To increase student success, districts should promote parental involvement and ensure that teachers receive adequate support and training.
Districts should also periodically assess the needs and progress of ESE students and make adjustments as needed to ensure that students perform to their capacity.
The pre-referral process of the Duval County School District is designed to prevent the over-identification of students in the ESE program.
The pre-referral process is working effectively.
During the period August 1, 2001, to July 29, 2002, the district had 3,139 referrals for service and staffed 2,404 or 76.6% of those students.
Those not staffed were deemed to be ineligible for services.
The district has implemented student/teacher assistance teams to ensure that all appropriate interventions are implemented before referral to special education.
The district implements specific procedures to ensure that all appropriate interventions are employed prior to referral to the Psychological Services Department for identification and placement in the special education program.
Pre-referral activities are those interventions that address a student's learning problems prior to referral for a complete multidisciplinary evaluation.
The pre-referral process is cost-effective and saves the district funds by eliminating the cost of psychological testing for students who do not qualify for special education.
The pre-referral process consists of the following activities: conferences, anecdotal records/behavioral observations, interventions, and review of records.
Timely psychological assessment of students suspected of having a disability is an important issue.
Most students in the district are assessed within 60 days.
The district also conducts assessments over the
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-11
Educational Service Delivery summer to reduce the number of pending cases at the beginning of each school year.
If the assessments are not completed by October, the district cannot receive funding until February, resulting in a loss of one-half of the additional state funds for the following year.
State funding is adjusted after FTE counts, while federal funding is calculated only once a year.
Consequently, reporting child count has a significant impact on the district's additional state and federal funding for ESE programs.
The district actively pursues trying to identify gifted students in under-represented groups through "plan B" referrals as outlined in Rule 6A-6.03019, Florida Administrative Code.
Thirty percent of the district's gifted referrals in 2001-02 were "plan B" referrals resulting in 191 (22% of all referrals found to be eligible for gifted programs) students eligible for gifted programs under "plan B." Despite being successful in substantially increasing the number of gifted students through "Plan B" minority students remain underrepresented in the district's gifted programs, as they are across the state.
According to Fall 2001 student membership data, the district student population is 48.2% white non-Hispanic and 42.8% black non-Hispanic.
For the same year 69.4% of the gifted students were white and only 16.4% were black.
The Individuals with Disabilities Act (IDEA) requires that students with disabilities be educated in general education classrooms unless "the nature and severity of the disability is such that education in the regular classes with the use of supplementary aids and services cannot be achieved satisfactorily."
The ESE program provides a range of placement options from the least restrictive to the most restrictive.
Students are included in the general classroom with accommodations and curricular adaptations.
Special classes and special schools are considered when students' needs cannot be met in a general classroom with supplementary support or services.
There are five Exceptional Student Education schools.
In addition, several self-contained classrooms are located on school campuses where students with severe disabilities can interact in nonacademic instructional settings with their nondisabled peers.
The percentages in Exhibit 4-10 represent the number of students with disabilities in general education placements in the district and its peer districts.
The Duval County School District places comparable percentages of students with disabilities in general education as its peer districts.
In the district, approximately 2% of children with disabilities ages 3-5 are educated with their nondisabled peers and 49% of students ages 6-21 spend 80% or more of their instructional time in general education settings.
Exhibit 4-10 Percentage of ESE Students in General Education Classrooms 80% or More and Number of Special Schools in Duval County and Peer Districts 1999-2000 to 2000-01 District Broward Duval Hillsborough Orange Palm Beach Pinellas State
1999-2000 Ages 3-5 10% 2% 7% 3% 4% 10% 7%
1999-2000 Ages 6-21 68% 49% 49% 56% 57% 53% 49%
Number of Special Schools 2000-01 8 5 9 4 3 7 140
Source: LEA Profiles, 1999-00 School Year; Profiles of Florida School Districts 2000-01.
Duval County School District has a high percentage of its ESE students participating in the FCAT (see Exhibit 4-11).
Students in ESE who follow the standard curriculum are expected to meet the promotional standards of their grade level.
Teachers provide appropriate test accommodations as indicated on the student's Individualized Education Plan (IEP).
Only students who meet all the State Department of
4-12
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery Education criteria are excluded from the state and district assessment and are eligible to take an alternative to the FCAT, the Performance Assessment System for Students with Disabilities (PASSD).
The district-developed alternative curriculum incorporates the state's performance standards for ESE students.
District administrators provide directions to teachers through the Excent Manual and the IDEA Resource Book.
The ESE Director monitors the district's efforts through its Evaluation Plan Component 3(A-I).
The evaluation plan includes reports of FCAT results, PASSD results, diploma report, and school reports.
In addition, the ESE staff examines graduation, promotion and retention and drop-out rates of students in the ESE program.
Exhibit 4-11 FCAT 2002 Participation and Performance Students with Disabilities and All Students Grade 4 Percentage Students with Disabilities Tested 92% 93% 80% 79% 80% 84% 84% Percentage Students with Disabilities Scoring at Level 3 and Above 22% 26% 19% 23% 25% 26% 11%
FCAT Reading Grade 8 Percentage Students with Disabilities Tested 69% 82% 74% 73% 71% 74% 80% Percentage Students with Disabilities Scoring at Level 3 and Above 15% 14% 12% 13% 17% 11% 5%
Grade 10 Percentage Students with Disabilities Tested 52% 56% 47% 51% 61% 70% 64% Percentage Students with Disabilities Scoring at Level 3 and Above 11% 9% 13% 9% 11% 6% 4%
Pinellas Broward Orange Palm Beach Hillsborough Duval Dade
Grade 5 Pinellas Broward Hillsborough Orange Palm Beach Duval Dade 92% 91% 78% 83% 81% 83% 85% 17% 24% 24% 16% 18% 19% 10%
FCAT Math Grade 8 68% 81% 70% 74% 73% 73% 80% 19% 21% 28% 17% 18% 13% 5% 53% 57% 62% 47% 50% 71% 64%
Grade 10 25% 27% 30% 31% 24% 14% 8%
Source: LEA Profiles, 1999-00 School Year; Profiles of Florida School Districts 2000-01.
The superintendent's emphasis on student performance and data-driven decisions is beginning to pay off.
The district has a pattern of better performance among ESE students in lower grades.
This pattern is similar to that of non-disabled students.
The district compares well to its peers on grade 4 reading and grade 5 math FCAT assessments for ESE students.
However, as with the FCAT scores for nondisabled students, FCAT scores for Duval disabled students are lower than its peers for grades 8 and 10.
The same is true for graduation rates with a standard diploma.
In 2001, Duval County School District graduated 39% of ESE students compared to Hillsborough's 66%, Palm Beach's 64%, and Pinellas County's 66% standard diploma graduation rate.
Duval's ESE high school students have had fewer years under a system of strong, focused accountability, such as the district is currently experiencing.
The elementary students know only the current successful system.
Over time, the favorable comparison enjoyed by the district's elementary students will progress with these students as they move through the system.
By the time the current grade 4 students become grade 10 students, their higher scores will reflect more favorably for the district.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-13
Educational Service Delivery The district does a good job at providing ESE students with employment opportunities.
The district provides job coaches who work with the community in finding jobs for many ESE high school students.
Following graduation, many of these students are able to hold down a job and be productive members of society.
This is apparently a well-received practice of the district and receives cooperation from the community, where more than 60 job locations are currently available for ESE students.
The district filed a report with the appropriate ESE state agency in which they listed 16 schools as participating in community based instruction, an increase of 5 schools over the previous year.
They reported 508 students, an increase of 157; and worked with 21 job coaches, which was up 5 from the previous year.
The number of employment sites rose from 61 to 98.
It is anticipated that 114 graduating students will continue in their employment with these employers, up from 98 the year before.
The community based instruction is one of the ESE programs that the district is committed to expanding as needs of students dictate such action.
The district does not maximize Medicaid reimbursement.
Two Medicaid reimbursement programs are available to all Florida school districts: (1) fee-for-service reimbursement for direct services and (2) administrative claiming fees.
The district is not collecting fee-for-service funds at this time.
Exhibit 4-12 illustrates that of its peers, Duval is the only district not claiming the fee-for service reimbursement.
In 1999-2000, the district's speech therapists, physical therapists, and occupational therapists opted out of participating in the program and became a part of their employment contracts.
All of Duval's peer districts participate in Medicaid reimbursement for therapy services and nursing services.
Five out of six of the peers are reimbursed for mental health psychological services.
By not pursuing Medicaid reimbursement for direct services the district is forgoing an estimated $161,000 annually in revenue.
Exhibit 4-12 Unlike It's Peers, the Duval County School District Does not Maximize Medicaid Reimbursements for Services It Provides to ESE Students 1998-99 Disabled Enrollment Dade Hillsborough Broward Pinellas Palm Beach Orange Duval 37,567 21,197 26,014 20,467 20,454 21,686 20,386
1/1--12/31, 1999 Reimbursement $636,631 629,862 0 342,558 168,815 51,537 $128,874
2001-02 Disabled Enrollment 41,583 25,525 29,682 20,276 22,346 24,821 20,058
1/1--12/31, 2002 Reimbursement $1,400,908 541,592 415,340 384,140 377,682 223,970 $0
Source: Duval County Research Department.
We recommend that the district reinstitute claiming Medicaid reimbursement for direct services provided to ESE students.
Based on the billing per student of peer districts for similar services provided by the Duval County School District, we estimate an increase in revenue of $285,000 annually.
Subtracting the funds needed for the salary and benefits of administrative personnel to implement billing for direct services, the district can net $161,000 annually.
(Based on hiring a Coordinator I, Administrative Support Specialist, and a Secretary II.)
4-14
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery
Best Practice 3: Using The district provides effective and efficient programs to meet the needs of at-risk students including English for Speakers of Other Languages (ESOL), Title I, and alternative education.
Students at risk for failing or falling behind grade level often have significant barriers to learning, and therefore, need various specialized services and programs to address these barriers and to be academically successful.
School districts should have programs in place to meet the diverse needs of these students, especially those students who need academic and/or social skills interventions to assist them to perform well.
School districts should periodically assess the academic and social needs of their students and use this information to identify or develop programs to meet those needs.
To increase student success, districts should promote parental involvement and provide teachers adequate training and support.
Districts should also periodically assess the progress of at-risk students, making adjustments to programs as needed to ensure that students perform to their capacity.
Students in the Duval County School District are placed in effective and efficient programs to meet their needs if they are at-risk students, including alternative education, Title I, and ESOL.
As with its regular education programs, the superintendent's emphasis on student performance and datadriven decisions is driving improvements in the district's alternative education, Title I, and ESOL programs.
The Duval County School District has responded to the needs of its students who require non-traditional alternative education approaches.
Developed in partnership with the Jacksonville Children's Commission and community-based agencies to provide academic assistance and recreational/enrichment opportunities for students in grades K-12, these safety net programs include: Extended Day Enrichment Program ­ a before and after school program for working parents that includes academic enhancement activities, academic remediation, and homework assistance TEAM UP ­ a after school program focusing on individualized academic assistance closely linked to school day instruction Accelerated Learning Centers ­ a dropout prevention program using flexible hours, self-paced instruction with strong teacher support, computer software support, Internet access, and open-entry, open-exit, personalized educational programs.
Graduation Initiatives - a dropout prevention program in which students earn a district-designated high school diploma via the GED Exit Option strategy.
The district tracks the performance (e.g., grades, FCAT scores, promotion rates, and graduation rates) of the students in these alternative education programs and compares their performance to their peers in regular programs.
The grades and promotion rates of students in these programs routinely exceed those of their peers.
The district structures these alternative education programs based on identified student needs and comparisons of student performance.
The district compiles data on selected indicators for each school and ranks the schools based on nine-grade retentions, percentage of satisfactory English and mathematics grades, FCAT scores, mobility rate, dropout rate, percentage of students absent 20 days or more, percentage of students ready for college, and graduation rate.
Based on these rankings, the district implements Accelerated Learning Centers and Graduation Initiative programs at school sites.
These initiatives are having a positive impact on student success for the district, and have contributed to the district's reducing its dropout rate from 8.3% in 2000-01 to 5.7% in 2001-02.
The Graduation Initiatives Program had 298 students enrolled in 2001-02.
Sixty-three percent of 189 of these students passed both their FCAT and GED and graduated with their classes.
The Accelerated Learning Centers had 346 enrolled in 2001-02, and they earned an additional 868 credits.
More than 100 Exceptional
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-15
Educational Service Delivery Student Education students completed their workplace studies and received employment within the community.
The Duval County School District's ESOL program has benefited from the superintendent's emphasis on student performance and data-driven decisions.
The district's Limited English Proficient (LEP) plan encompasses the timely identification, assessment, and placement of limited English proficient students based on identified needs; appropriate programming based on student needs; and monitoring of student progress after program exit.
Through the efforts of the district's Research, Assessment, and Evaluation Department ESOL student academic assessments are disaggregated for use in school improvement plans to drive program improvement.
In addition, our review of the district's records of the ESOL program confirmed the ESOL supervisor's statements that the program provides mechanisms to ensure comprehensible instruction to students with limited English proficiency.
The ESOL program utilizes grade/course curriculum using the standard ESOL methodologies at a level appropriate to the students' knowledge of the English language.
The program is consistent with the Multicultural Education Training and Advocacy agreement, Florida State Board of Education Administrative Rules, and Florida School Laws The Title I program provides extra resources to the district to help improve instruction in high-poverty schools and ensure that poor children have the same opportunity as other children to meet the Florida state standards.
Title I schools use the district's school improvement planning process to identify student academic and nonacademic needs, design strategies to meet these needs, and track the improvement of their students' outcomes.
Title I schools have aligned and integrated required Title I school-wide plans with the districts school improvement planning process discussed in section 6 on this chapter.
Best Practice 4: Using The district provides an appropriate range of accelerated programs (such as Advanced Placement, International Baccalaureate, and Dual Enrollment).
However the district needs to improve the academic performance of students taking advanced placement exams.
Highly motivated and academically talented high school students need educational challenges and opportunities to accelerate their learning and meet their academic potential.
To meet the needs of these students, districts should provide an appropriate number and type of accelerated programs, such as Advanced Placement, International Baccalaureate, and Dual Enrollment.
Districts should periodically assess the needs of their highly motivated and academically talented high school students and use this information to identify and develop accelerated programs to meet those needs.
Districts should ensure that accelerated programs are made accessible to all eligible students and that teachers, parents, and students are aware of such opportunities.
To increase student success, districts should ensure that teachers receive adequate support and training.
Districts should also take advantage of incentives and technical assistance offered through the Florida Department of Education and the College Board.
The Duval County School District provides Advanced Placement, International Baccalaureate, Dual Enrollment, Accelerated College, and Early Admissions programs.
Advanced placement programs are offered at the high school level and through the Florida Virtual School.
The International Baccalaureate Program is available at two high schools.
These high schools were recently honored by being named by Newsweek Magazine to the top 100 high schools in the U.S. for their accelerated programs.
Stanton High was rated number one and Paxon High was number seven.
All Duval County School students can participate in the Dual Enrollment program, even if it is not offered at their schools.
The district has made a concerted effort to enroll all students who meet program criteria regardless of racial, ethnic, or minority status.
The district makes a good-faith effort to inform all its students of accelerated programs and special programs.
This is communicated through the Website, counselors, district printed brochures, memos, letters to parents, and various other methods.
Counselors, principals, and central office personnel annually monitor and measure the need for course offerings through
4-16
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery discussions with parents, students, and community members.
Additionally, principal interviews and campus visits reveal that all students, not just a select few, are notified, recruited, and encouraged to take courses that are more advanced.
The district offers Advanced Placement classes on all high school campuses.
Stanton and Paxon High Schools have the greatest participation numbers in AP classes because of the International Baccalaureate programs located at their schools.
However, more than 60% of the AP students are distributed among the other high schools.
Advanced Placement class offerings are not the same at all 18 high schools because the interests of the students vary across the district.
The schools pay for Advanced Placement examination fees for students from funds generated by additional FTE as authorized and provided by the Legislature for every student who earns a three or higher on the examinations, and the district offers Advanced Placement workshops to teachers.
AP teachers are given incentive pay from the funds generated by the additional FTE as authorized and provided by the Legislature for every student who earns a three or higher on the examinations.
The schools pay for International Baccalaureate examination fees for these students with funds generated by additional FTE for every student who earns a passing score on the examinations.
The district pays for the textbooks for Dual Enrollment courses for these students.
The district, in cooperation with Florida Community College at Jacksonville (FCCJ), provides Dual Enrollment agreements for Career Education students, utilizing both college-credit and vocational non-credit opportunities.
The percentage of students passing (three or higher) on the Advanced Placement exams is low on some campuses--the success of this program needs to be evaluated on individual campuses.
Out of 35 districtwide Advanced Placement classes, only seven had more than 70% of students making three or higher on the end-of-course exam.
Exhibit 4-13 shows the Advanced Placement Exam Results by school for 2002.
Exhibit 4-13 The Percentage of Students Scoring a Three or Higher on Advanced Placement Exams is Low on Several Campuses, Indicating the Need for Evaluating the Courses at These Campuses School Lee Jackson Baldwin Paxon Parker Englewood Ribault Anderson Stanton Raines Fletcher Wolfson Sandalwood Forrest White Mandarin First Coast District
No.
Students Taking Exams 18 44 24 464 157 62 35 183 753 58 197 174 206 63 23 266 36 2,763
No.
Exams Taken 22 47 24 1,069 224 96 42 315 1,848 73 319 314 308 87 24 522 68 5,402
No.
Exams 3.0+ 1 1 0 448 126 27 2 155 1,139 4 138 129 140 31 7 336 30 2,714
Percentage Exams 3.0+ 4.5% 2.1% 0.0% 41.9% 56.3% 28.1% 4.8% 49.2% 61.6% 5.5% 43.3% 41.1% 45.5% 35.6% 29.2% 64.4% 44.1% 50.2%
Source: Advanced Placement Program, The College Board, June 2002.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-17
Educational Service Delivery While it is generally recognized that students who take more advanced course work will also do well on standardized tests designed by third party sources, a good grade in locally designed advanced courses will only translate into good scores on third-party testing if the curriculum of the locally designed courses is rigorous and is aligned with the material tested by those testing sources.
The reason that a score of "3" or higher on an Advanced Placement exam is important is that colleges and universities will grant college credit at their institutions for those courses regardless of a class grade, even a grade of "F."
For example, a grade of "A" in an Advanced Placement course with a corresponding grade below "3" on the exam gets no college credit.
A grade of "C," "D," or "F" in an Advanced Placement class with a corresponding score of "3" or higher on the exam will gain the student college credit for the course.
Interviews with district personnel at both the campus-and central-office level indicate that there is a concern that some teachers view the assignment of teaching Advanced Placement courses as a privilege to set their own curriculum, and if students do well on their teacher-made tests, that their job is fulfilled.
They further indicated that the proper attitude and understanding of the importance of the end result on the part of students and teachers alike is critical for the success of this program.
The district must ensure that advanced course offerings challenge students appropriately, and lead to the future college credit benefits for which these programs were designed.
We recommend the following: Select teachers who have Masters Degrees in the core subject areas that they are teaching or at least additional hours above the basic certification requirements.
This is especially important for the math and science content areas, because a greater understanding of these academic areas on the part of the teacher is necessary to teach the more advanced work to students.
Ensure that all course curriculums are aligned with the Advanced Placement exams, the Sunshine State Standards, and the ACT and SAT exams.
Hold teachers accountable for successful results on these measures by reporting results of their Advanced Placement students on the Advanced Placement exams, the ACT, the SAT, and the FCAT.
Teachers must understand that an Advanced Placement class must follow the Advanced Placement curriculum rather than teaching just what the teacher thinks is important.
Teaching these courses is a privilege and in some cases, a special assignment to challenge students to perform at a level beyond the norm, but with accountability for results.
Begin recruiting students and their parents at the middle-school level to envision participation in a rigorous, exciting curriculum when they get to high school.
This can be done with a variety of communication mechanisms including career fairs, parent-teacher meetings, course-selection materials, Web site postings, counseling efforts, and strategic plan initiatives, modeling the magnet program concept.
Best Practice 5: Using The district provides effective and efficient workforce development programs (such as vocational-technical, adult basic education, and adult high school programs).
Students who do not plan to attend college immediately after high school need to enhance their ability to be economically self-sufficient.
Many of these students benefit greatly from workforce development programs, such as career and technical education, which help them to attain the skills they need to become or remain employed.
These programs are designed to provide training to meet local and state workforce needs and to help Florida compete in a global economy by building a broadly based, highly skilled, productive workforce.
The programs also provide a variety of services, including literacy training, English language skills, or attainment of high school diploma for adults who need these skills to enter the labor market.
Districts should have workforce development programs in place that meet the
4-18
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery needs of business and industry in their areas, including high skill/high wage occupations as well as occupations that are in critical demand by the community.
Districts should periodically assess workforce development program offerings to ensure that needed programs and newly emerging occupations are addressed.
Districts should also provide adult basic education programs that reach all sectors of the population and meet the needs of students at all literacy levels.
To assess student success and improve programs, districts should monitor changes in performance funding, student completion, and job placement.
Unlike its peer group, the Duval County School District does not have administrative responsibility for adult education programming in Duval County.
Florida Community College at Jacksonville (FCCJ) is the primary provider of Adult High School, GED, and Adult Basic Education classes for the district as outlined in the agreement between the school district and FCCJ.
The Duval County School District rents classroom space to FCCJ at six district high school sites.
The district maintains a strong focus to provide workforce development programs to meet the needs of their students and the community.
The general director of Applied Technology and Career Development regularly attends meetings and serves on the board of WorkSource, the local Workforce Development Board.
Also, Applied Technology and Career Development programs are geared to reflect community needs by obtaining input from the Jacksonville Chamber of Commerce, local labor union involvement in pre-apprenticeship programs, local community college involvement with Tech Prep articulation and dual enrollment agreements, and feedback from local business and industry partners and advisory committee members.
Meetings are held monthly with these work advisory committees.
Union representatives help not only by attending and actively participating in the meetings, but by funding certain curriculum materials.
For example, the National Industry Curriculum used in the Construction Academy at Randolf High School was jointly approved by the district and the unions, which helped purchase the textbooks that meet industry standards.
They provided curriculum materials for heating, ventilating and air conditioning, electrical, plumbing, and carpentry.
Representatives of the North East Florida Builders Association, various trade unions, academy coordinators, school administrative staff, district-level administrative staff, the University of Northern Florida, and FCCJ all participate in these meetings.
The district's school board, in partnership with the Jacksonville Chamber of Commerce, began implementing the ACT WorkKeys program during the 1997-98 school year.
WorkKeys is a program designed to close the gap between the levels of job skills needed in today's workplace and the actual skill levels possessed by high school graduates.
District administrators assess the level of workplace skills all students currently possess.
The assessments include the areas of applied mathematics, applied technology, listening, locating information, observation, reading for information, teamwork, and writing.
Each skill is described by a skill scale.
The same skill scale is the basis of the system and its four components: (1) the assessments measure the skills of the individual; (2) profiling measures the level of skill required for a particular job or occupation; (3) instructional support provides structure for teaching the skills in school; and (4) reports and research serve as the communication links between student examinees, employers, and educators.
By providing a common language for individuals, educators, and employers, WorkKeys helps create links between the world of business and educational entities.
This enables educators and trainers to communicate with individuals and employers, and to focus instructional materials and programs on meeting their mutual needs.
Through quarterly meetings, the Inter-Agency Advisory Council considers Exceptional Student Education (ESE) students' transition goals and skills.
Members of the council include representatives from education, industry, business, agencies, the City of Jacksonville, and colleges.
The district's Academies of Technology coordinate vocational/technical program offerings.
ESE students who qualify participate in the academy programs and high school vocational/business classes.
Transition Individual Education Plans (TIEPs) completed for exiting seniors link ESE students to post-secondary options and community services/agencies.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-19
Educational Service Delivery The district offers career academies in selected high schools.
Academies are small learning communities organized around a particular career or professional theme.
Students, including ESE students with TIEPs, take a rigorous academic curriculum and are expected to graduate with a triple-crown diploma, which includes: The Academic Foundation Certificate certifying the students' ability to do college-level work in English/Language Arts and mathematics without remediation.
Post-secondary credit earned by taking career-related or academic coursework on the campus of a post-secondary partner; and Industry certification (or evidence that the student is working toward certification) from a regional/state/national industry coalition or apprenticeship/pre-apprenticeship opportunities.
Employers and colleges partner with the school to provide students with ample opportunities to learn outside of the classroom.
Students are expected to participate year-round (postsecondary or work-based experiences in the summer).
The Career Academy is divided into an upper and lower level.
At the lower level, students concentrate on basic academic skills but still take some career electives.
Students who have earned their Academic Foundation Certificate are admitted to the upper level, where the focus is on career and workforce education, and are rewarded with paid internships and apprenticeships their junior or senior year of high school.
Mentorships help forge a connection between each academy student and a caring professional adult.
The Academy of Finance at Wolfson High School, a magnet program which became a career academy, has been a successful career academy for more than 10 years.
Affiliated with the National Academy Foundation, this program has been identified as a national model.
This model for career academies has been implemented at both Peterson and Randolph Academies of Technology.
Each of these schools has developed strong business partnerships that are critical elements of the career academy model.
The district's model includes such items as: Rigorous academic curriculum.
Career or professional theme.
A Freshman Success Academy that is designed to provide a seamless transition from middle to high school.
The freshman academy will help prepare students for academic and career success and reduce the high ninth-grade dropout rate.
Safety net programs to provide extra help to students during the school year, after school hours, and during the summer.
Also part of the safety net programs is the Summer Bridge Program for incoming freshmen who need additional academic skills in order to be successful in the career academy.
Internships that provide practical job experiences.
Students who participate in career academies have a higher attendance rate, score higher on FCAT reading and math, and have a higher promotion rate than non-academy students at the same school.
An example is depicted in Exhibit 4-14.
4-20
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery Exhibit 4-14 Students Attending the Andrew Jackson Health Academy Have Better Student Performance Than Non-Academy Students, 2002 Andrew Jackson Health Academy Performance Data 2002
92
78.9
Health/Med
NA/SSch
84 55
51 22 8 13.4 Percentage 3+ Math
Absent 
Percentage 3+ Reading
Percentage Promoted
Indicators Source: Duval County School District Research Department.
Students also have opportunities to earn college credit while still in high school through dual enrollment and tech prep articulation agreements with FCCJ.
Some career academy students can earn 22 or more college credits while still in high school.
In addition, career academy participants are prepared for both college and today's workforce because they receive instruction based upon current industry standards; they have mentors from the business community; and they are engaged in job shadowing and internships while still in high school.
Finally, participants have increased motivation to succeed because they can relate their education to a career of their choice.
Instruction in a Career Academy is contextual, which means it directly relates to their chosen career area.
The district has initiated a number of successful programs to ensure that their at-risk students make a smooth transition to the workforce, including a GED program through its Graduation Initiatives.
The Graduation Initiatives Program for Dropout Prevention is designed to award a high school diploma to students who are over-age and have not been successful in earning the credits required for graduation.
The GED Exit Option Model is a program approved through an agreement between the Florida DOE and the American Council of Education (ACE) to assist overage-for-grade students in graduating from high school through successful completion of the GED Test and the FCAT exam.
Generally, students currently enrolled in high school are not allowed to take the GED test as a means for graduation.
This is done to avoid encouraging students to leave school before graduation.
However, ACE has given authorization to several states, including Florida, to use GED testing as an exit option for over-age-forgrade students.
As indicated in Exhibit 4-15, the school-to-work programs for the district meet or exceed those of their peers in all instances with the exception of continuing education data for Pinellas County.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-21
Educational Service Delivery Exhibit 4-15 Fall 2001 High School Graduates From Duval County School District's School-to-Work Programs Compare Favorably to Those of It's Peers Florida Employment Data Percentage Percentage Employed Employed Full-Time Broward Duval Hillsborough Orange Palm Beach Pinellas 47% 60% 61% 52% 50% 56% 29% 35% 32% 29% 33% 31%
Florida Continuing Education Data 57% 57% 57% 52% 54% 62%
Source: Florida Education and Training Placement Information Program, 2001.
Best Practice 6: Using The district ensures that schools use effective planning and evaluation processes to improve student outcomes, including school improvement plans and other data-driven processes such as the Sterling process.
High-performing districts and schools use effective processes to assess and improve student outcomes.
Florida law requires that each district school have a school improvement plan that establishes the school's specific goals, objectives, and strategies to meet the educational needs of their students.
Districts should ensure that all schools effectively plan and evaluate programs and strategies to improve student outcomes.
Districts should ensure that each school's improvement plan addresses the needs of major subgroups of students (regular, ESE, ESOL, Title 1, and so on.) and incorporates and integrates to the extent possible other school-level improvement planning processes (Title I, technology, school improvement, Sterling, and so on.).
To increase effectiveness of the school improvement process, districts should provide training for school improvement teams that includes using academic and nonacademic data to identify areas needing improvement, developing measurable objectives, and evaluating progress in meeting objectives.
Districts should also oversee the school improvement planning process and provide additional assistance to schools that do not make adequate progress.
All schools in the Duval County School District have a board-approved school improvement plan.
The school improvement plan process is coordinated through the Office of Research, Assessment, and Evaluation.
This office provides data to school principals for use in the planning process, enabling principals to compare school and district achievement levels and to examine achievement levels of students at the classroom level.
Data is disaggregated, enabling principals to determine the achievement levels of subgroups of students.
The school improvement plans emphasize measurable objectives focused on student outcomes, action steps to achieve the objectives, assignment of responsibility for completing actions steps, and timelines for implementation.
Copies of the school improvement plans are available on the district's Web site and in the office of Research, Assessment, and Evaluation.
A plan for assisting schools that have a state grade of D or F has been developed and implemented through the Office of Academic/Special Programs.
The goal of the district's assistance plan is to enable the schools to improve students' achievement based on mastery of Sunshine State Standards.
The objectives of the plan are: Provide student achievement data to school leaders to enable them to target students with identified needs in mastery of Sunshine State Standards in reading, writing, mathematics, and science.
Improve students' mastery of Sunshine State Standards in reading so that they will achieve at or above FCAT Level 3.
4-22
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery Improve students' mastery of Sunshine State Standards in mathematics so that they will achieve at or above FCAT Level 3.
Maintain students' high level writing skills.
Improve students' test taking skills.
Train teachers to implement best practices in reading, writing, mathematics, and science instruction.
Some low-performing campuses may also be Title I schools.
Title I schools not only have the Florida school grades to consider, but also Title I standards.
Title I schools will follow the procedures outlined in the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (Title I Part A, Section 1116).
As soon as a Title I school is identified as needing Title I School Improvement (not making adequate yearly progress for two consecutive years), a notice will be sent to the parents of all children enrolled in the school explaining what the identification means; the reasons for the identification; what the school is doing to address the problem; how the district and the state will help; how parents can become involved; and an explanation of their option to transfer their child to another public school.
After the second year of identification, the parents of those children remaining in the school must be notified of their right to obtain supplemental instruction for their child.
After the third year of identification, the district will publish and disseminate information regarding any corrective action to the public and the parents at the identified school through such means as the Internet, the media, and public agencies in a language that the parents can understand.
Throughout this period of time, technical assistance will be provided to the school to assist in making adequate yearly progress.
Assistance will be provided by the district, the Region II Title I Technical Assistance Center, the Region XIV Comprehensive Center, the Office of School Improvement, local universities, and other agencies approved by the district or the state.
Best Practice 7: Using The district ensures effective progression of students from kindergarten through grade 12 that maximizes student mastery of the Sunshine State Standards and prepares students for work and continued education.
In 1996, the State Board of Education adopted the Sunshine State Standards as content expectations for K-12 students in Florida.
Since that time, the standards have been refined and expanded to include grade level expectations and represent the academic expectations for Florida students by grade level and subject.
Florida districts and schools should have modified their instructional programs and aligned curriculum to include the standards to ensure that students master necessary skills and will be able to perform at the next grade level.
Thus, districts must have a clear, comprehensive, easy-to-follow student progression plan that meets state requirements and incorporates the Sunshine State Standards.
The plan should be specific, informing teachers and school administrators of factors to consider in deciding whether to promote or retain a student.
The plan should also specify the steps schools should take to ensure that retained students either receive intensive remedial assistance or are placed in a program different from what the student received the previous year.
To ensure that students progress as expected from kindergarten through grade 12 and are prepared for work and continued education, districts should have and use strategies that facilitate smooth transitions from one school level to the next.
Districts should also periodically assess how well their students progress and use this information to make adjustments as needed.
The Duval County School District's pupil progression plan provides the framework for progression of students in grades K-12 to ensure effective progression of its students that maximizes student mastery of the Sunshine State Standards and prepares students for work and continued education.
The plan is annually reviewed and revised at the elementary-, middle-, and high-school levels by review committees consisting of teachers, district- and school-based administrators, counselors, parents, representatives from ESE, and representatives of the bargaining unit.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-23
Educational Service Delivery The pupil progression plan, published by the district and issued to all schools, is available to students and parents and is a complete compilation of a student's expectations and requirements to both enter the school and eventually to exit the school.
It elaborates on requirements for enrolling, determining grades, promotion policies, retention policies, course requirements through high school, graduation requirements, and questions parents could have regarding policies and procedures for entering school to graduation.
The district's plan is continually updated to reflect current state and federal guidelines and changes.
Teachers regularly assess student progress toward meeting district expectations, develop academic improvement plans for students, and provide intensive remedial instruction to maximize the student's ability to progress to the next grade or level.
For the past two years, the district implemented an ongoing system for monitoring the achievement of students who scored below the fortieth percentile on a standardized test.
Campus staff analyzes data at the school level to assist in development and revision of academic improvement plans and to identify students who need to be served through supplemental remedial programs implemented by the school.
Additional funds are allocated to each school based on FTE and students' achievement levels to fund supplemental academic instructional programs.
Teachers regularly refer students needing additional help to the many Safety Net programs throughout the district, such as the Students Taking Academic Responsibility (STAR) Program at the elementary level and the Graduation Initiative Program, the Performance-Based Diploma Program, and the Accelerated Learning Centers at the secondary level.
Academic improvement plans are developed and remedial instruction is offered before school, after school, and on Saturdays for all dropout-prevention students.
If the academic improvement plan is not readily available at the opening of school, dropout-prevention teachers are instructed to complete the dropout Safety Net Improvement Plan form which serves to cover this until the academic improvement plan arrives.
Regional meetings as well as feeder pattern meetings are held for principals and teachers to discuss common needs for the children and to devise plans focused on improvement.
Additionally, meetings are scheduled for teachers between grade levels at each campus and between transition grades from one campus to the next so that there will be a smooth progression for the child moving through the system.
District report cards are sent to parents each quarter.
In addition, scholarship warnings are sent home at any time during the quarter that a student's progress is considered unsatisfactory.
Parental contact is emphasized on a weekly basis in the Accelerated Learning Center Program through the Parental Contact Form and in TEAM UP by the TEAM UP Progress and Tracking forms.
Both progress reports and notes to parents, as well as conferences, keep parents informed of their student's progress.
Reports of student success on statewide assessments are sent home to parents.
Translations are available through a service that provides written, telephone call on-the-spot, and inperson translations.
Best Practice 8: Using The district's current organizational structure and staffing of educational programs minimize unnecessary administrative layers and processes.
School districts that operate efficiently meet the needs of their teachers and students with minimal administrative layers and staff.
To meet this best practice, school districts should have a central office organizational structure that ensures adequate administrative oversight of education programs, adequate curriculum and instructional support for teachers, and adequate support to enable schools to identify their needs and evaluate their effectiveness.
In addition, districts should ensure that individual school staffing levels are sufficient to meet the needs of students and are comparable across schools in the district.
4-24
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery Duval County School District operates a decentralized organizational structure, which places district services closest to campus needs.
Regionalization of schools and departmentalization of administrators provide clear lines of responsibility and authority to assist schools and implement successful programs.
The district has a well-defined organizational structure for educational programs.
Based on national comparisons prepared by the Educational Research Service (ERS), the district does not appear to be out of line.
The district reviews administrative responsibilities annually and makes changes accordingly.
An examination of the district's organization indicates reasonable spans of control for the work assigned.
The only area that may be of concern is the five regions.
The district is divided into five regions with a regional superintendent in charge of each region.
Dividing 163 campuses into five regions places more than 30 schools under each regional superintendent.
A regional director assists the regional superintendent in the work directly with principals.
This mitigates the large span of control of each of the region superintendents.
Still, this pushes the limit for the span of control.
Political and budgetary concerns are usual reasons for a reluctance to add additional administrative staff.
Normal supervisory spans of control range from 3 to 14 persons.
Educational entities typically have larger spans of control than do private enterprises, usually due to budget constraints.
Principals interviewed indicated that having the regional director in addition to the regional superintendent has helped to decentralize the central staff and made administrative support more readily available to the building administrator.
They feel that the central office is very responsive to them under this arrangement.
During the annual budget process, jobs are reviewed for value added, as well as whether additional staff is needed.
Additional staff requests are reviewed by the budget review committee and salary review committee for need.
Positions were reviewed in 1995-96 as part of administrative redirect and programs were reviewed four years ago.
The Instructional Services program will be reviewed in 2003-04.
The district is entirely accredited, and, at a minimum, meets School Advisory Council (SAC) guidelines determined at each campus.
If workloads are too high, campuses may appeal to the appropriate regional superintendent and budget office for additional staffing.
Also, the district uses Educational Funding Accountability reports from the state, educational resource services, and outside service resources to compare itself to districts from around the state and nation as to comparable expenditures.
According to the district's comparability report filed with the Florida DOE, the district chooses option 2, which uses pupil-teacher ratios for comparability purposes.
Exhibit 4-16 compares the district with its peers on average class sizes.
In most cases, the district's average class size is on par with its peers.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-25
Educational Service Delivery Exhibit 4-16 Duval County School District Average Class Sizes Compare Favorably with Peers District Language Arts Grades 6-8 Broward Dade Duval Hillsborough Orange Palm Beach 29.5 28.4 25.8 21.4 23.9 27.4 32.3 27.8 27.6 22.8 25.8 26.8
Math 29.3 30.4 27.0 20.7 25.6 26.5 32.5 28.5 28.0 25.2 28.2 23.7
Science 29.9 32.0 27.9 24.4 27.8 29.3 32.3 29.3 29.1 26.0 28.5 28.6
Social Studies 29.5 32.8 27.4 24.4 26.9 29.0 32.7 30.4 31.2 28.5 29.0 30.0
Elementary K-5 26.6 24.7 23.9 23.7 21.3 25.9
Grades 9-12 Broward Dade Duval Hillsborough Orange Palm Beach
Source: Florida School Indicators Report, 2001.
EFFECTIVE SUPPORT
AND
E
FFICIENT INSTRUCTIONAL
Best Practice 9: Using The district ensures that students and teachers have sufficient current textbooks and other instructional materials available to support instruction in core subjects and to meet the needs of teachers and students.
However the district can improve its lost textbook collections by implementing a bar-code inventory system in all schools.
To meet the needs of teachers and students, school districts should ensure that all schools have sufficient numbers of current, state-adopted textbooks and other instructional materials available to support instruction in core subjects.
Districts should solicit input from teachers when selecting textbooks and other instructional materials.
To increase availability of textbooks, districts should seek to purchase, maintain, and dispose of textbooks in a cost-effective manner.
Districts should collect monies from students who have damaged or lost textbooks and use these monies to offset materials costs or to purchase additional materials.
The Duval County School District follows Florida DOE procedures and implements adoption cycles as specified to provide sufficient current textbooks and other instructional materials.
Textbook selection committees comprised of teachers, principals, and parents participate in the selection and adoption process.
All schools place individualized instructional materials orders on an as-needed basis.
New adoptions costs are estimated and updated based on Florida Association of District Instructional Materials Administrators cost estimates and FTE counts.
Quantities are purchased based on FTE and teacher and subject area supervisor recommendations.
Principals are apprised of options available under the adoption criteria and can select options that are deemed most suitable in meeting students' needs.
Supplemental texts, manipulatives, and other ancillary materials are purchased for the STAR Program students and for LEP students and teachers.
4-26
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery When materials are ready to be disposed of due to updating or wear, the district follows the procedure found in State Board Rules and Florida Statutes in discarding those materials.
Disposals involve community give-away items, credit for trade-ins and recycling, and from time to time, textbooks are lost and must be paid for.
The district collects lost textbook funds from individual campuses and deposits these funds in the instructional materials account.
Collecting for lost textbooks has been a challenge.
The district has implemented a bar code system in 94 of 163 schools, making accounting of books easier.
The district has tried to aggressively collect through building principals, who have responsibility for textbooks and lost textbooks.
Duval is making a conscious effort to improve the collection process for lost textbooks.
It has reduced the value of textbooks lost and not paid from $708,275 in 1999-00 to $362,270 in 2001-02.
Exhibit 4-17 shows the amount of textbooks lost and paid for versus the amount lost and not paid for.
Exhibit 4-17 Duval County School District Has Improved It's Collections for Lost Student Textbooks School Year 198 198 199 199 199 199 199 199 199 199 199 199 200 200 8-89 9-90 0-91 1-92 2-93 3-94 4-95 5-96 6-97 7-98 8-99 9-00 0-01 1-02
Lost and Not Paid $731,270 715,220 720,020 535,718 440,080 523,660 478,210 347,560 614,181 494,523 550,785 708,275 362,220 362,270
Lost and Paid $ 68,536 75,146 89,936 110,529 144,387 143,907 116,990 93,048 98,839 100,012 110,050 98,241 140,570 181,996
Source: Duval County School District.
While the district is using this best practice it should implement more efficient means that are available to collect for lost textbooks, such as mandating the use of the barcode system at all campuses.
The district could also consider invoicing principals for any amounts owed by the school that have not been recouped.
We recommend mandating the use of the barcode system at all campuses.
The district needs to continue to, at the campus level, implement the bar code accounting and should consider invoicing the building principals for amounts owed by the school.
This would speed up bar code adoption and aggressive lost textbook programs.
Best Practice 10: Using The district has sufficient school library or media centers to support instruction.
To use this best practice, school districts should have sufficient school library/media center resources to support instruction.
Library materials and equipment should be up to date and centers should operate during hours that meet the needs of students.
To maximize the availability of library materials, the district should have and regularly use procedures to reduce library and media costs, such as coordinating orders across schools to take advantage of bulk rate discounts.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-27
Educational Service Delivery The Duval County School District has sufficient school library or media centers to support instruction and is a part of the annual Southern Association of Colleges and Schools (SACS) accreditation report completed by school-based administrators to document the adequacy of the media center collection and staff allocation.
Annual inventory reports ensure all schools meet SACS standards.
Continual collection weeding and growth are encouraged.
The district is a Sunlink district, which ensures statewide interlibrary loan capabilities and Sunlink computers.
All media centers operate during the school operating hours or as determined at the school site by use of school-based decision-making authority on library hours of operation at each school.
Library personnel make all efforts to be available when the students need their services.
Additionally, district staff works cooperatively with the Jacksonville Public Library System staff to coordinate program offerings and family literacy.
The district funds classroom libraries, which are coordinated with and circulated through the media center.
In 2002-03, the district allocated the $700,000 they received from the state plus an additional $6,000,000 locally to upgrade and purchase new library books.
Principals use their local campus budget and receive additional funds specifically earmarked from the state to purchase books.
All campuses meet SACS requirements for numbers of materials and personnel and are in the process of refurbishing and upgrading their inventories.
The district purchases countywide online services and library automation software at substantial savings.
Library books usually are purchased through the state bid, thus ensuring bulk pricing.
The district has purchased Follett library automation software and support for all schools.
The district office maintains a union database of holdings.
Best Practice 11: Using The district utilizes instructional technology in the classroom to enhance curriculum and improve student achievement.
Technology has the potential to enhance curriculum and instruction, help improve student achievement, and assist students in attaining basic computer skills needed for the twenty-first century.
Whenever possible, districts should use technology to support classroom learning.
For instance, districts should offer a variety of courseware focused on helping students achieve grade-level academic benchmarks as well as learning to use common software packages.
To increase student success, districts should ensure that all students have opportunities to use computer software while in school.
Districts should also periodically obtain feedback from teachers and principals related to the usefulness and adequacy of instructional technology and use this information when selecting future materials.
The Duval County School District uses instructional technology to enhance curriculum and improve student achievement.
The district provides opportunities for students to utilize technologies in order to benefit by graduating with skills needed for post-secondary education and employment in the twenty-first century.
Also, the district ensures that all students are encouraged to use technology in school and are required to use computers and current, appropriate software in completing assignments as part of the regular curriculum.
Students at all schools are regularly given time to work on computers, and students without computer access at home are able to access computers through school.
The district formally obtains feedback from teachers and principals as to the usefulness of instructional technology in the classroom and uses this information when selecting future materials.
The district has been exploring technology skills assessment options.
The district piloted the use of Taking a Good Look at Instructional Technology (TAGLIT) assessment tool originally funded through a Gates grant and now managed through FloridaLeaders.Net for the state.
The previous state Technology Resource Survey (TRS) was primarily an inventory of equipment and access.
In January 2003, the state revised the TRS to focus on how technology was used in schools by principals, teachers, and students.
4-28
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery The No Child Left Behind (NCLB) Legislation states (Title II Part D) that the district must ensure by 2006 that every student is technologically literate by the time the student finishes eighth grade.
Additionally, the district must ensure that teachers and principals are technologically literate.
Instructional Technology has designed a series of courses for teachers that provide the necessary skills to help the district achieve that goal.
The Instructional Technology Department also conducted a Technology Integration Needs Assessment online survey during the month of February 2003 at www.educationcentral.org/intech/TechNeeds.htm to assist the department in determining whether these courses do indeed meet the needs of teachers and in prioritizing the courses to offer teachers given our limited staff and resources.
The schools were requested to have teachers complete the survey between 1/21/2003 and 2/28/2003.
The district media center makes available an array of computer software which is aligned with and integrated into the current mathematics curriculum in geometry and statistics for all secondary schools.
It also provides two classroom sets of graphing calculators, together with calculator projection tablets for each middle school.
Additionally, the district media center makes available for school checkout four classroom sets of graphing calculators together with projection tablets, and two classroom sets of fourfunction calculators for selected elementary schools.
Many of the ESOL Center Schools have Compass Learning ESOL software available for use.
The Department of Instructional Materials and Media Services has purchased the BigChalk online research database for all secondary schools and administrators.
The research component of this program is aligned with the SSS.
The content of the databases supports research in all curricular areas, as well as professional education.
A list of approved software, primarily network-based software, is published on the Instructional Technology Web site at www.educationcentral.org/intech/approvedsw.htm, which is updated regularly.
Instructional Technology staff has coordinated software reviews with Academic Programs staff, Testing staff, and Technology Research and Development staff for such solutions as an Integrated Learning System (ILS) for the high school dropout prevention initiative and FCAT assessment.
The review addresses instructional content, alignment with standards, and technical support issues.
The Technology Research and Development Department reviews all school and district purchases of network-based or district wide licenses of instructional software prior to purchase.
All items reviewed through this process are published on the Web site listed above.
The state conducted a Technology Resource Survey in October 2001.
The district report for Duval County School District is available at www.firn.edu/webfiles/others/edtech/district_login01.php and selecting Duval at log in.
Some highlights from the report follow.
The district has 25,821 computers in use for instructional purposes at least once per week.
Computers for administrative use are not included in this figure.
One thousand five hundred forty seven modern computers are in media centers (Power Mac; G3; G4; iMac; Pentium I-IV).
One hundred fifteen schools reported that the technology is available for teacher and student use after regular school hours.
One hundred four schools have computers labs for student use.
One hundred twenty seven schools use computers with students in their media centers.
One hundred fifty two schools use computers in their classrooms with students.
Fifty one schools report that the majority of their students are able to create products to present/communicate in simple ways, such as presentation software.
Sixty eight schools report the majority of their students are able to independent conduct electronic information searches.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-29
Educational Service Delivery Sixty five schools report the majority of their students use ILS regularly in the curriculum.
The Compass Learning Management System (Compass) and high school courseware were purchased for 13 high schools in support of the Graduation Initiative, Accelerated Learning Centers, and other in-school and after-school safety net programs.
Implementation began in the summer of 2001.
Compass software is an important instructional tool in the implementation of the Graduation Initiative at 13 high school sites, the Comprehensive Accelerated Learning Center Program at Forrest and Jackson High Schools, and the Modified Accelerated Learning Center Program at 12 high schools.
In the Comprehensive Accelerated Learning Center and Modified Accelerated Learning Center Programs, components of Compass software, along with textbook and computer assignments, are integrated into the course matrices, which students complete in order to earn high school credits.
Compass software has made an important contribution to the success of the Graduation Initiative and Comprehensive Accelerated Learning Center Programs (implemented in 2001-02) and the Modified Accelerated Learning Center Program (implemented in 2002-03).
In 2001-02, 63% (189 of 298) students satisfactorily completed the Graduation Initiative Program and received their high school diplomas.
In 2002-03, 388 students are attending the Graduation Initiative program and using Compass software as a normal part of their coursework.
During 2001-02, 346 students attended the Comprehensive Accelerated Learning Centers at Forrest and Jackson, earning a total of 868 credits, with 23 students graduating.
In 2002-03, 375 students have earned a total of 261 credits, with 22 students already meeting the requirements for high school graduation.
In September 2002, 297 students earned 54 credits through the Modified Accelerated Learning Center Program.
The district is currently exploring the possibility of expanding the use of Compass to middle schools for course recovery and to accelerate learning.
Best Practice 12: Using The district provides necessary support services (guidance counseling, psychological, social work, and health) to meet student needs and to ensure students are able to learn.
To be successful learners, students often need a variety of non-academic services to meet their health, social, and emotional needs, which if left unattended may present significant barriers to their ability to learn.
Districts should ensure that schools offer sufficient support services, such as counseling and social work to help maintain the overall well being of students.
An effective district periodically reviews and assesses its support services plan and uses this information to make adjustments as needed to help resolve barriers to student learning.
The Duval County School District provides necessary support services to meet student needs and to ensure students are able to learn.
The Duval County Health Department develops and maintains the district's School Health Services Plan mandated by the School Health Services Act.
The School Health Services Plan identifies the health services needs of students and provides an organized system for planning and reporting on all school health services.
The Health Department addresses student health needs by providing direct nursing services and utilizing dental vans and other community health agency services.
The district's Guidance Department, in conjunction with the University of North Florida, has implemented the Supporters of Academic Rigor initiative to improve the quality of guidance services to students.
The district provides nursing, social work, and counseling services to students at five schools through its Health Club USA program.
Health Club USA's staff identifies student needs by conducting health fairs, surveys, and parent workshops.
The district's six Full Service Schools programs provide case management, counseling, mentoring, and youth development services to students.
The Full Service Schools' oversight committees and staff identify student needs by conducting parent, student, and community surveys.
4-30
McConnell Jones Lanier 
Educational Service Delivery Additionally, the Student Services Department reviews information from parents, school personnel, and the ESE Department to evaluate the effectiveness of its services.
The department also reviews information from the department's internal referral database, as well as staff's reports and logs, to improve the quality and effectiveness of psychological, guidance, health, and social work services.
The district's Research, Assessment, and Evaluation Department conducts an annual Customer Satisfaction Survey.
This survey provides the schools the opportunity to evaluate the services provided by the various departments at the district office.
In addition, a School Climate Survey of parents, students, and employees is conducted that provides feedback from these three groups regarding the operation of the schools.
The Pre-kindergarten School Readiness Program is available in 42 elementary schools, serving more than 1,000 three- and four-year-old, economically disadvantaged children.
Each child is provided a highquality nationally accredited preschool experience, along with vision screening, health screening, and referrals to other agencies, if needed.
The Office of Early Education and Intervention also provides early learning experiences through the Even Start Family Literacy Program (which also includes GED classes for parents of young children), the Florida First Start Program, and the Home Instruction Program for Preschool Youngsters.
Together, with support of the district and the community at large, young children are better prepared to enter school ready to learn.
McConnell Jones Lanier 
4-31
